Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 227.200 TO 227.400 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as of December 31, 2026, all existing
single-family dwellings and multifamily residential units shall have at least one
(1) working smoke detector inside each dwelling or unit that is:
(a) Hardwired into the electrical circuit; or
(b) Powered by a nonremovable, tamper proof, ten (10) year lithium battery.
(2) Any required smoke detector shall be installed in each single-family dwelling or
multifamily residential unit prior to the sale, lease, change of ownership, or
change in tenancy of the dwelling or unit.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the property owner, seller, or lessor to test and
provide a working smoke detector in a single-family dwelling or multifamily
residential unit. The seller or lessor shall attest to the presence and functioning of
the required smoke detector by providing a signed affidavit to the:
(a) Purchaser at the real estate closing; or
(b) Lessee prior to the tenancy of the property.
(4) Failure to provide the affidavit required by subsection (3) of this section shall not
invalidate the transfer or lease, but the seller or landlord may be subject to a civil
penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per violation. The state fire
marshal or local government authority given jurisdiction by ordinance pursuant
to KRS 227.320 shall enforce this section.
(5) An individual licensed under KRS Chapter 324 shall not be liable for the actions
or inactions of a property owner or seller under this section.
(6) The department shall promulgate, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, a
standard transfer affidavit for a property owner, seller, or lessor to use to fulfill
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/26/2025 2:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 977
the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/26/2025 2:09 PM Jacketed